California, session 20252026, SB549.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 33195.4 of the Education Code is amended to read:33195.4. For purposes of this article, “heritage school” means a school that serves children who are at least 4 years and 9 months of age and no older than 18 years of age, who attend a public or private full-time day school, that does all of the following:(a) Only serves children 18 years of age or younger who attend a public or private full-time day school and who meet either of the following requirements:(1) Are at least 4 years and 9 months of age.(2) Are enrolled in kindergarten, including transitional kindergarten, or grades 1 to 12, inclusive.(a)(b) Specifies regular hours of operation.(b)(c) Offers education or academic tutoring, or both, in a world language.(c)(d) Offers education on the culture, traditions, or history of a country other than the United States.(d)(e) Offers culturally enriching activities, including, but not limited to, art, dancing, games, or singing, based on the culture or customs of a country other than the United States.(e)(f) Maintains membership in a state or national cultural or language association.(f)(g) Complies with relevant local government regulations, where applicable.(g)(h) Does not operate out of a residential home.(h)(i) Complies with the requirements of Section 33195 and maintains in its possession a copy of the registration form electronically filed with the Superintendent. The heritage school shall make this form available upon request, including to the State Department of Social Services, to verify exemption from child care childcare licensure.SEC. 2. Section 33195.6 of the Education Code is amended to read:33195.6. (a) A director of a heritage school shall undergo at least 15 hours of health and safety training. The training shall include all of the following components:(1) Pediatric first aid.(2) Pediatric cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR).(3) A preventive health practices course or courses that include instruction in the recognition, management, and prevention of infectious diseases, including immunizations, and prevention of childhood injuries.(4) Training in pediatric first aid and CPR pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be provided by a program approved by the American Red Cross, the American Heart Association, or the Emergency Medical Services Authority pursuant to Section 1797.191 of the Health and Safety Code.(5) Training in preventive health practices pursuant to paragraph (3) shall be provided by a training program approved by the Emergency Medical Services Authority.(6) In addition to the training programs specified in paragraphs (4) and (5), training programs or courses in pediatric first aid, pediatric CPR, and preventive health practices offered or approved by an accredited postsecondary educational institution are considered to be approved sources of training that may be used to satisfy the training requirements of paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive.(7) Persons who, prior to the effective date of this section, September 23, 2010, have completed a course or courses in preventive health practices as described in paragraph (3), and have a certificate of completion of a course or courses in preventive health practices, or certified copies of transcripts that identify the number of hours and the specific course or courses taken for training in preventive health practices, shall be deemed to have met the training requirement for preventive health practices pursuant to paragraph (3).(b) All employees and volunteers of a heritage school shall be in good health, as verified by a health screening, including a test for tuberculosis, performed by, or under the supervision of, a licensed physician and surgeon.(c) Pupils attending heritage schools shall have access to working sinks, toilets, and drinking water.(d) No pupil attending a heritage school shall have access to medication or cleaning supplies, except as otherwise provided by law.(e) A heritage school, as defined in Section 33195.4, shall not be subject to licensure by the State Department of Social Services as a child day care center pursuant to Chapter 3.4 (commencing with Section 1596.70) or Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 1596.90) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.(f) Upon a pupil’s enrollment in a heritage school, the heritage school shall provide a notice to the pupil’s parent or guardian stating that the heritage school is exempt from child care childcare licensure, and that attendance at a heritage school does not satisfy California’s compulsory education requirements pursuant to Section 48200. 48200, and that the department has no regulatory authority over heritage schools and does not monitor heritage school operations or instruction.SECTION 1.Section 53398.75.7 of the Government Code is amended to read:53398.75.7.(a)This section shall be known and may be cited as the Second Neighborhood Infill Finance and Transit Improvements Act, or NIFTI-2.(b)At any time before or after the adoption of the infrastructure financing plan, a city, county, or city and county may adopt a resolution to allocate property tax revenues of that entity to the district, if all of the following apply:(1)The area to be financed with funds received pursuant to this section is within one-half mile of a major transit stop, as defined in Section 21064.3 of the Public Resources Code.(2)The infrastructure financing plan requires that at least 40 percent of the total funds received by the district pursuant to this section be used for the acquisition, construction, or rehabilitation of housing, including the costs of predevelopment and land acquisition, for households with incomes below 60 percent of area median income for rent or purchase. Predevelopment costs include, but are not limited to, site control, engineering studies, architectural plans, application fees, legal services, permits, bonding, and site preparation.(3)The infrastructure financing plan requires that 50 percent of the housing funds are used to develop housing affordable to and occupied by households with incomes below 60 percent and greater than 30 percent of area median income, and 50 percent of the housing funds are used for either housing affordable to and occupied by households with incomes below 30 percent of area median income or permanent supportive housing to help homeless persons get off the street.(4)The infrastructure financing plan gives first priority for occupancy of housing funded through this plan to income-qualified households displaced from the district through no fault of their own, and secondary priority for occupancy of housing funded through this program is given to households with a member or members employed within two miles of the district.(5)The infrastructure financing plan requires that at least 10 percent of the total funds received by the district pursuant to this section be used for investments in the capital costs of parks, urban forestry, or permanent greening improvements along boulevards, streets, or other public areas within a district, or active transportation capital projects that qualify under the Active Transportation Program (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 2380) of Division 3 of the Streets and Highways Code), including pedestrian or bicycle facilities or supportive infrastructure, including connectivity to transit stations.(c)The remaining funds may be used for any of the following:(1)Multifamily affordable housing projects or mixed-use projects with affordable multifamily housing and ground floor commercial uses that support infill and compact development.(2)Transit capital projects, including transit stations and programs supporting transit ridership, including waterborne transit.(3)Transit-oriented development projects, including affordable housing and infrastructure at or near transit stations or connecting those developments to transit stations.(4)Capital projects that implement local complete streets programs.(5)Parking, including detached and decoupled parking structures that provide parking for residents, businesses, or visitors in lieu of onsite parking for proposed developments. These parking structures should provide no more than one space for each residential unit. The ground floors in these parking structures should provide space for pedestrian-oriented commercial or public uses. Revenues from parking may be used to implement transportation demand management programs to reduce automobile trips to and from the district.(6)Other projects or programs designed to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and other criteria air pollutants by reducing automobile trips and vehicle miles traveled within a community.(d)The infrastructure financing plan shall ensure that the requirements of this section are met every 10 years.(e)(1)Sections 53398.66 and 53398.67 shall not apply to the adoption of an enhanced infrastructure financing plan that includes the allocation of property tax revenues pursuant to this section.(2)(A)The public financing authority shall consider adoption of the enhanced infrastructure financing plan at three public hearings that shall take place at least 30 days apart.(B)At the first public hearing, the public financing authority shall hear all written and oral comments, but take no action.(C)At the second public hearing, the public financing authority shall consider any additional written and oral comments and take action to modify or reject the enhanced infrastructure financing plan. If the enhanced infrastructure financing plan is not rejected at the second public hearing, then the public financing authority shall conduct a protest proceeding at the third public hearing to consider whether the landowners and residents within the enhanced infrastructure financing plan area wish to present oral or written protests against the adoption of the enhanced infrastructure financing plan.(3)The draft enhanced infrastructure financing plan shall be made available to the public and to each landowner within the area at a meeting held at least 30 days prior to the notice given for the first public hearing. The purposes of the meeting shall be to allow the staff of the public financing authority to present the draft enhanced infrastructure financing plan, answer questions about the enhanced infrastructure financing plan, and consider comments about the enhanced infrastructure financing plan.(4)(A)Notice of the meeting required by paragraph (3) and the public hearings required by this paragraph shall be given in accordance with paragraph (11). The notice shall do all of the following, as applicable:(i)Describe specifically the boundaries of the proposed area.(ii)Describe the purpose of the enhanced infrastructure financing plan.(iii)State the day, hour, and place when and where any and all persons having any comments on the proposed enhanced infrastructure financing plan may appear to provide written or oral comments to the enhanced infrastructure financing district.(iv)Notice of the second public hearing shall include a summary of the changes made to the enhanced infrastructure financing plan as a result of the oral and written testimony received at or before the public hearing and shall identify a location accessible to the public where the enhanced infrastructure financing plan proposed to be presented and adopted at the second public hearing can be reviewed.(v)Notice of the third public hearing to consider any written or oral protests shall contain a copy of the enhanced infrastructure financing plan adopted pursuant to paragraph (2), and shall inform the landowner and resident of their right to submit an oral or written protest before the close of the public hearing. The protest may state that the landowner or resident objects to the public financing authority taking action to implement the enhanced infrastructure financing plan.(B)At the third public hearing, the public financing authority shall consider all written and oral protests received prior to the close of the public hearing and shall terminate the proceedings or adopt the enhanced infrastructure financing plan subject to confirmation by the voters at an election called for that purpose. The public financing authority shall terminate the proceedings if there is a majority protest. A majority protest exists if protests have been filed representing over 50 percent of the combined number of landowners and residents in the area who are at least 18 years of age. An election shall be called if between 25 percent and 50 percent of the combined number of landowners and residents in the area who are at least 18 years of age file a protest.(5)An election required pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) shall be held within 90 days of the public hearing and may be held by mail-in ballot. The public financing authority shall adopt, at a duly noticed public hearing, procedures for this election.(6)If a majority of the landowners and residents vote against the enhanced infrastructure financing plan, then the public financing authority shall not take any further action to implement the proposed enhanced infrastructure financing plan. The public financing authority shall not propose a new or revised enhanced infrastructure financing plan to the affected landowners and residents for at least one year following the date of an election in which the enhanced infrastructure financing plan was rejected.(7)At the hour set in the notice required by paragraph (2), the public financing authority shall consider all written and oral comments.(8)If less than 25 percent of the combined number of landowners and residents in the area who are at least 18 years of age file a protest, the public financing authority may adopt the enhanced infrastructure financing plan at the conclusion of the third public hearing by ordinance. The ordinance adopting the enhanced infrastructure financing plan shall be subject to referendum as prescribed by law.(9)For the purposes of this chapter, the enhanced infrastructure financing plan shall be the enhanced infrastructure financing plan adopted pursuant to this section.(10)The public financing authority shall consider and adopt an amendment or amendments to an enhanced infrastructure financing plan in accordance with the provisions of this section.(11)The public financing authority shall post notice of each meeting or public hearing required by this section in an easily identifiable and accessible location on the enhanced infrastructure financing district’s internet website and shall mail a written notice of the meeting or public hearing to each landowner, each resident, and each taxing entity at least 10 days prior to the meeting or public hearing.(A)Notice of the first public hearing shall also be published not less than once a week for four successive weeks prior to the first public hearing in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the area lies. The notice shall state that the district will be used to finance public facilities or development, briefly describe the public facilities or development, briefly describe the proposed financial arrangements, including the proposed commitment of incremental property tax revenue, describe the boundaries of the proposed district, and state the day, hour, and place when and where any persons having any objections to the proposed infrastructure financing plan, or the regularity of any of the prior proceedings, may appear before the public financing authority and object to the adoption of the proposed plan by the public financing authority.(B)Notice of the second public hearing shall also be published not less than 10 days prior to the second public hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the area lies. The notice shall state that the district will be used to finance public facilities or development, briefly describe the public facilities or development, briefly describe the proposed financial arrangements, including the proposed commitment of incremental property tax revenue, describe the boundaries of the proposed district, and state the day, hour, and place when and where any persons having any objections to the proposed infrastructure financing plan, or the regularity of any of the prior proceedings, may appear before the public financing authority and object to the adoption of the proposed plan by the public financing authority.(C)Notice of the third public hearing shall also be published not less than 10 days prior to the third public hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the area lies. The notice shall state that the district will be used to finance public facilities or development, briefly describe the public facilities or development, briefly describe the proposed financial arrangements, including the proposed commitment of incremental property tax revenue, describe the boundaries of the proposed district, and state the day, hour, and place when and where any persons having any objections to the proposed infrastructure financing plan, or the regularity of any of the prior proceedings, may appear before the public financing authority and object to the adoption of the proposed plan by the public financing authority.(f)(1)The public financing authority shall review the enhanced infrastructure financing plan at least annually and make any amendments that are necessary and appropriate in accordance with the procedures set forth in paragraph (5) and shall require the preparation of an annual independent financial audit paid for from revenues of the enhanced infrastructure financing district.(2)A public financing authority shall adopt an annual report on or before June 30 of each year after holding a public hearing. Written copies of the draft report shall be made available to the public 30 days prior to the public hearing. The public financing authority shall cause the draft report to be posted in an easily identifiable and accessible location on the enhanced infrastructure financing district’s internet website and shall mail a written notice of the availability of the draft report on the internet website to each owner of land and each resident within the area covered by the enhanced infrastructure financing plan and to each taxing entity that has adopted a resolution pursuant to Section 53398.68. The notice shall be mailed by first-class mail, but may be addressed to “occupant.”(3)The annual report shall contain all of the following:(A)A description of the projects undertaken in the fiscal year, including any rehabilitation of structures, and a comparison of the progress expected to be made on those projects compared to the actual progress.(B)A chart comparing the actual revenues and expenses, including administrative costs, of the public financing authority to the budgeted revenues and expenses.(C)The amount of property tax increment revenues received.(D)The amount of revenues expended for housing meeting the requirements of this section.(E)An assessment of the status regarding completion of the enhanced infrastructure financing district’s projects.(F)The amount of revenues expended to assist private businesses.(4)If the public financing authority fails to provide the annual report required by paragraph (1), the public financing authority shall not spend any funds received pursuant to a resolution adopted pursuant to this section until the public financing authority has provided the report.(5)Every 10 years, at the public hearing held pursuant to paragraph (2), the public financing authority shall conduct a protest proceeding to consider whether the landowners and residents within the enhanced infrastructure financing district wish to present oral or written protests against the enhanced infrastructure financing district. Notice of this protest proceeding shall be included in the written notice of the hearing on the annual report and shall inform the landowner and resident of their right to submit an oral or written protest before the close of the public hearing. The protest may state that the landowner or resident objects to the public financing authority taking action to implement the enhanced infrastructure financing plan on and after the date of the election described in paragraph (6). The public financing authority shall consider all written and oral protests received prior to the close of the public hearing.(6)If there is a majority protest, the public financing authority shall not take any further action to implement the enhanced infrastructure financing plan on and after the date the existence of a majority protest is determined. If between 25 percent and 50 percent of the landowners and residents file protests, then the public financing authority shall call an election of the landowners and residents in the area covered by the enhanced infrastructure financing plan, and shall not initiate or authorize any new projects until the election is held. A majority protest exists if protests have been filed representing over 50 percent of the combined number of landowners and residents at least 18 years of age or older in the area.(7)An election required pursuant to paragraph (6) shall be held within 90 days of the public hearing and may be held by mail-in ballot. The public financing authority shall adopt, at a duly noticed public hearing, procedures for holding this election.(8)If a majority of the landowners and residents vote against the enhanced infrastructure financing plan, then the public financing authority shall not take any further action to implement the enhanced infrastructure financing plan on and after the date of the election held pursuant to paragraph (5). This subdivision shall not prevent the public financing authority from taking any and all actions and appropriating and expending funds, including, but not limited to, any and all payments on bonded or contractual indebtedness, to carry out and complete projects for which expenditures of any kind had been made prior to the date of the election.(g)Notwithstanding Section 53398.52, revenues collected and allocated for the purposes of this section shall not be used for highway or highway interchange improvements.(h)The district shall require, by recorded covenants or restrictions, that affordable housing units financed pursuant to this section remain permanently available at affordable housing costs to, and occupied by, very low income households, persons and families of low income, or persons and families of low or moderate income for the longest feasible time, but for not less than 55 years for rental units and 45 years for owner-occupied units.(i)A legislative body shall not adopt an ordinance terminating an enhanced infrastructure financing district created pursuant to this section if the district has not complied with its affordable housing obligations.(j)Notwithstanding Article 4 (commencing with Section 53398.77), bonds issued by a district pursuant to this section may be issued without voter approval.(k)Paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 1720 of the Labor Code shall not apply to projects financed by the enhanced infrastructure financing district.(l)The changes made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to resolutions adopted on or after January 1, 2026.SEC. 2.Division 9 (commencing with Section 62470) is added to Title 6 of the Government Code, to read:9.Resilient Rebuilding Authority for the Los Angeles Wildfires62470.The County of Los Angeles may establish a Resilient Rebuilding Authority for the Los Angeles Wildfires to coordinate, accelerate, and streamline recovery in all jurisdictions impacted by the January 2025 wildfires.62470.1.The County of Los Angeles, in order to support the rebuilding and protection of homes, businesses, utilities, and other public infrastructure, may empower the authority, to the extent permitted by existing law, to engage in all of the following responsibilities:(a)Issue, receive, and administer funds, including, but not limited to, tax-increment financing, federal loans and grants, state loans and grants, and philanthropic grants, to support recovery.(b)Manage and coordinate rebuilding and related logistics between public and private reconstruction, including, but not limited to, private contractors, public and private utilities, and local governments.(c)Purchase lots at a fair price for land banking with first look sale options provided to returning residents and their families, and to create community amenities such as open space that promotes community-scale resiliency and insurability.(d)Work with builders to reconstruct properties designed and built to resilient construction standards, and that prioritize strategies for accelerated and cost-effective rebuilding.(e)Create economies of scale for acquiring equipment and materials to cost-effectively purchase critical construction materials in bulk.(f)Support the reconstruction workforce by partnering with trades, facilitating training and workforce development, and creating temporary workforce housing.(g)Enhance financing options for families and businesses that cannot afford to rebuild by deploying subsidized financing and grants in partnership with private lenders, community development finance institutions, private philanthropy, and nonprofit organizations.(h)Facilitate reconstruction of lost rental housing stock, including by promotion of accessory dwelling units, senior-serving housing, and replacement of affordable housing lost in the fires.(i)Carry out other activities that enhance neighborhood and property insurability and affordability, and promote a resilient and sustainable recovery.(j)Provide a meaningful mechanism for community engagement.SEC. 3.The Legislature finds and declares, with respect to Section 2 of this act, that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique circumstances facing the County of Los Angeles due to the wildfires of January 2025.